Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202675-308
Tariff; publication; unlawful practices.

It is unlawful for a regulated motor carrier to engage in the transportation of passengers or, until July 1, 2021, household goods, in intrastate commerce unless the motor carrier has filed, published, and kept open for inspection its tariff schedule as provided in section 75-124 in the manner prescribed by the commission pursuant to such section. Until July 1, 2021, no regulated motor carrier shall engage in the transportation of household goods in intrastate commerce unless it has obtained a copy of the most current applicable tariff, or a tariff prepared by a tariff publishing bureau or an individual, which conforms with the rates and charges prescribed by the commission.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. III, § 8, p. 1380;

Laws 1983, LB 309, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 424, § 34;

Laws 2020, LB461, § 11.